Utah statutes.
58-53-602.   Site plans to be sealed.

(1)  Any site plan prepared in this state shall bear the seal of a landscape architect licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Section 58-53-304, in Title 58, Chapter 22, Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act, in Title 58, Chapter 3a, Architects Licensing Act, or by the codes adopted under Title 58, Chapter 56, Utah Uniform Building Standards Act.

(2)  Any final site plan prepared by or under the supervision of the licensed landscape architect shall bear the seal of the landscape architect when submitted to a client, or when submitted to a building official for the purpose of obtaining a building permit, even if the practice is exempt from licensure under Section 58-53-304.

